New Jersey, session 222, A2941.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  No later than six months after the effective date of this section, the owner or operator of each solar energy facility one megawatt or larger in size shall inspect, or cause to be inspected, the power inverters and other relevant infrastructure at the facility for the presence of remote-access devices, which could allow the operation of the solar energy facility to be disrupted by an unauthorized person.  Any affected components shall be replaced with secure components. b.  Commencing on the effective date of this section, no solar energy facility greater than one megawatt in size shall commence operations unless the facility has been inspected pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of this section, and any affected components replaced with secure components. c.  The Board of Public Utilities may adopt, in accordance with the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this section. 2. This act shall take effect immediately.